Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7998.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-6.2-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-6.2 entitled "2021 Act
on Climate" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-6.2-8. Powers and duties of state agencies — Exercise of existing authority.
Addressing the impacts on climate change shall be deemed to be within the powers, duties,
and obligations of all state departments, agencies, commissions, councils, and instrumentalities,
including quasi-public agencies, and each shall exercise among its purposes in the exercise of its
existing authority, the purposes set forth in this chapter pertaining to climate change mitigation,
adaptation, and resilience in so far as climate change affects its mission, duties, responsibilities,
projects, or programs. The governor, in presenting proposed budget articles for each fiscal year,
shall set forth the climate considerations that were undertaken to move the state towards the
mandated goals set forth in this chapter. Each agency shall have the authority to promulgate rules
and regulations necessary to meet the greenhouse gas emission reduction mandate established by §
42-6.2-9.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005426
========